Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.290

Referee may take security.

The referees may take separate mortgages, and other securities for the whole, or convenient portions of the purchase money, of such parts of the property as are directed by the court to be sold on credit, in the name of the clerk of the court, and his or her successors in office; and for the shares of any known owner of full age, in the name of such owner.

[ 2011 c 336 s 228; Code 1881 s 580; 1877 p 121 s 584; 1869 p 138 s 533; RRS s 866.]